Maryland, session 2026, SB0573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–109.
(a) The affairs of the condominium shall be governed by a council of unit owners
which, even if unincorporated, is constituted a legal entity for all purposes. The council of
unit owners shall be comprised of all unit owners.
– 1 –

Ch. 804 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) The bylaws may authorize or provide for the delegation of any power of the
council of unit owners to a board of directors, officers, managing agent, or other person for
the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of the council of unit owners.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY IN CHARLES COUNTY.
(2) EACH MEMBER OF A BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR AN OFFICER OF A
COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS SHALL SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETE A TRAINING
CURRICULUM ON THE RESPONSIBILITIES OF BEING A MEMBER OR AN OFFICER
DEVELOPED BY:
(I) A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMISSION RECOGNIZED BY THE
STATE OR A LOCAL GOVERNMENT; OR
(II) AN ORGANIZATION APPROVED TO ADMINISTER THE
TRAINING CURRICULUM BY A RECOGNIZED COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMISSION.
(3) EACH MEMBER OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR OFFICER OF THE
COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS SHALL SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETE THE TRAINING
CURRICULUM REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE
INDIVIDUAL:
(I) IS FIRST ELECTED OR APPOINTED TO THE OFFICE; OR
(II) FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS IN OFFICE ON OCTOBER 1,
2025, BEGINS A SUBSEQUENT TERM AS A MEMBER OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR
AN OFFICER OF THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS.
(4) (I) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR OFFICERS OF THE COUNCIL
OF UNIT OWNERS SHALL:
1. CERTIFY THAT EACH MEMBER OR OFFICER
SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETES THE TRAINING CURRICULUM REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION;
2. RETAIN A COPY OF THE CERTIFICATE OF
COMPLETION OF EACH MEMBER OR OFFICER; AND
3. WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE CERTIFICATION OF THE
MEMBER OR OFFICER, REPORT TO THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMISSION ON THE
CERTIFICATION.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 804
(II) A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLETION ISSUED UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE VALID FOR 3 YEARS.
(III) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO REMAINS A MEMBER OF THE BOARD OF
DIRECTORS OR AN OFFICER OF THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS AT THE TIME THE
CERTIFICATE EXPIRES SHALL RENEW THE CERTIFICATION BY SUCCESSFULLY
COMPLETING THE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(5) IF A MEMBER OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR AN OFFICER OF
THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS DOES NOT SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETE THE
TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR THE
COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS MAY:
(I) REMOVE THE INDIVIDUAL FROM THE OFFICE; OR
(II) INVALIDATE A VOTE OF THE INDIVIDUAL.
[(c)] (D) (1) A meeting of the council of unit owners or board of directors may
not be held on less notice than required by this section.
(2) The council of unit owners shall maintain a current roster of names and
addresses of each unit owner to which notice of meetings of the board of directors shall be
sent at least annually.
(3) Each unit owner shall furnish the council of unit owners with his name
and current mailing address. A unit owner may not vote at meetings of the council of unit
owners until this information is furnished.
(4) A regular or special meeting of the council of unit owners may not be
held on less than 10 nor more than 90 days’:
(i) Written notice delivered or mailed to each unit owner at the
address shown on the roster on the date of the notice; or
(ii) Notice sent to each unit owner by electronic transmission, if the
requirements of § 11–139.1 of this title are met.
(5) Notice of special meetings of the board of directors shall be given:
(i) As provided in the bylaws; or
(ii) If the requirements of § 11–139.1 of this title are met, by
electronic transmission.
– 3 –

Ch. 804 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) Except as provided in § 11–109.1 of this title, a meeting of a governing
body shall be open and held at a time and location as provided in the notice or bylaws.
(7) (i) This paragraph does not apply to any meeting of the governing
body that occurs at any time before the meeting at which the unit owners elect officers or a
board of directors in accordance with paragraph (16) of this subsection.
(ii) Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph and to reasonable
rules adopted by the governing body under § 11–111 of this title, a governing body shall
provide a designated period of time during a meeting to allow unit owners an opportunity
to comment on any matter relating to the condominium.
(iii) During a meeting at which the agenda is limited to specific topics
or at a special meeting, the unit owners’ comments may be limited to the topics listed on
the meeting agenda.
(iv) The governing body shall convene at least one meeting each year
at which the agenda is open to any matter relating to the condominium.
(8) (i) Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is deemed
present throughout any meeting of the council of unit owners if persons entitled to cast 25
percent of the total number of votes appurtenant to all units are present in person or by
proxy.
(ii) If the number of persons present in person or by proxy at a
properly called meeting of the council of unit owners is insufficient to constitute a quorum,
an additional meeting of the council of unit owners may be called for the same purpose if:
1. The notice of the initial properly called meeting stated:
A. That the procedure authorized by this paragraph might be
invoked; and
B. The date, time, and place of the additional meeting; and
2. A majority of the unit owners present vote in person or by
proxy to call for the additional meeting.
(iii) 1. An additional meeting called under subparagraph (ii) of
this paragraph shall occur not less than 15 days after the initial properly called meeting.
2. Not less than 10 days before the additional meeting, a
separate and distinct notice of the date, time, place, and purpose of the additional meeting
called under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph shall be:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 804
A. Delivered, mailed, or sent by electronic transmission if the
requirements of § 11–139.1 of this title are met, to each unit owner at the address shown
on the roster maintained under paragraph (2) of this subsection;
B. Advertised in a newspaper published in the county where
the condominium is located; or
C. If the condominium has a website, posted on the homepage
of the website.
3. The notice shall contain the quorum and voting provisions
of subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph.
(iv) 1. At the additional meeting, the unit owners present in
person or by proxy constitute a quorum.
2. Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a majority of the
unit owners present in person or by proxy:
A. May approve or authorize the proposed action at the
additional meeting; and
B. May take any other action that could have been taken at
the original meeting if a sufficient number of unit owners had been present.
(v) This paragraph may not be construed to affect the percentage of
votes required to amend the declaration or bylaws or to take any other action required to
be taken by a specified percentage of votes.
(9) At meetings of the council of unit owners each unit owner shall be
entitled to cast the number of votes appurtenant to his unit. Unit owners may vote by proxy,
but the proxy is effective only for a maximum period of 180 days following its issuance,
unless granted to a lessee or mortgagee.
(10) Any proxy may be revoked at any time at the pleasure of the unit owner
or unit owners executing the proxy.
(11) A proxy who is not appointed to vote as directed by a unit owner may
only be appointed for purposes of meeting quorums and to vote for matters of business
before the council of unit owners, other than an election of officers and members of the
board of directors.
(12) Only a unit owner voting in person or by electronic transmission if the
requirements of § 11–139.2 of this title are met or a proxy voting for candidates designated
by a unit owner may vote for officers and members of the board of directors.
– 5 –

Ch. 804 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(13) Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, a unit owner may nominate
himself or any other person to be an officer or member of the board of directors. A call for
nominations shall be sent to all unit owners not less than 45 days before notice of an election
is sent. Only nominations made at least 15 days before notice of an election shall be listed
on the election ballot. Candidates shall be listed on the ballot in alphabetical order, with
no indicated candidate preference. Nominations may be made from the floor at the meeting
at which the election to the board is held.
(14) Election materials prepared with funds of the council of unit owners
shall list candidates in alphabetical order and may not indicate a candidate preference.
(15) Unless otherwise provided in this title, and subject to provisions in the
bylaws requiring a different majority, decisions of the council of unit owners shall be made
on a majority of votes of the unit owners listed on the current roster present and voting.
(16) (i) A meeting of the council of unit owners to elect a board of
directors for the council of unit owners, as provided in the condominium declaration or
bylaws, shall be held within:
1. 60 days from the date that units representing 50 percent
of the votes in the condominium have been conveyed by the developer to members of the
public for residential purposes; or
2. If a lesser percentage is specified in the declaration or
bylaws of the condominium, 60 days from the date the specified lesser percentage of units
in the condominium are sold to members of the public for residential purposes.
(ii) 1. Before the date of the meeting held under subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph, the developer shall deliver to each unit owner notice that the
requirements of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph have been met.
2. The notice shall include the date, time, and place of the
meeting to elect the board of directors for the council of unit owners.
(iii) If a replacement board member is elected, the term of each
member of the board of directors appointed by the developer shall end 10 days after the
meeting is held as specified in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(iv) Within 30 days from the date of the meeting held under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the developer shall deliver to the officers or board of
directors for the council of unit owners, as provided in the condominium declaration or
bylaws, at the developer’s expense:
1. The documents specified in § 11–132 of this title;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 804
2. The condominium funds, including operating funds,
replacement reserves, investment accounts, and working capital;
3. The tangible property of the condominium; and
4. A roster of current unit owners, including mailing
addresses, telephone numbers, and unit numbers, if known.
(v) The replacement reserves delivered under subparagraph (iv)2 of
this paragraph for a residential condominium shall be equal to at least the reserve funding
amount recommended in the reserve study completed under § 11–109.4 of this title as of
the date of the meeting.
(vi) 1. This subparagraph does not apply to a contract entered
into before October 1, 2009.
2. A. In this subparagraph, “contract” means an
agreement with a company or individual to handle financial matters, maintenance, or
services for the condominium.
B. “Contract” does not include an agreement relating to the
provision of utility services or communication systems.
3. Until all members of the board of directors of the
condominium are elected by the unit owners at a transitional meeting as specified in
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a contract entered into by the officers or board of
directors of the condominium may be terminated, at the discretion of the board of directors
and without liability for the termination, not later than 30 days after notice.
(vii) If the developer fails to comply with the requirements of this
paragraph, an aggrieved unit owner may submit the dispute to the Division of Consumer
Protection of the Office of the Attorney General under § 11–130(c) of this title.
(17) (i) Elections, including the collection and counting of ballots and the
certifying of results, for officers or members of the governing body other than the full
membership of the council of unit owners shall be conducted by independent parties who:
1. Are not candidates in the election; and
2. Do not have a conflict of interest regarding any candidate
in the election.
(ii) A unit owner is an independent party if the unit owner:
1. Complies with the requirements of this section;
– 7 –

Ch. 804 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. Does not electioneer for any candidate; and
3. Is not subject to an objection by more than 25 percent of
the eligible voting members of the council of unit owners.
(iii) Unless property management for a condominium is owned by the
condominium, or a parent association of the condominium, representatives of the
condominium’s property management are not independent parties.
(18) The governing body may retain a third–party vendor or employ a
commercial technology platform to conduct an election.
(19) Individuals conducting an election shall make reasonable efforts to
ensure that the election is fair and that there is accountability for the process and the
results of the election.
(20) A unit owner designated to conduct an election who acts in good faith
is not personally liable in connection with the conduct of the election.
(21) (i) The governing body shall make reasonable accommodations,
including reasonable use of any portion of common areas, for unit owners to engage in
organizing activities relating to governance of the condominium.
(ii) The governing body may not prevent unit owners from or
retaliate against unit owners for exercising rights guaranteed under law or under the
governing documents of the condominium.
(22) Provisions of the governing documents, rules, or regulations of a
condominium relating to the conduct of elections that are inconsistent with the
requirements of this section are unenforceable and void.
[(d)] (E) The council of unit owners may be either incorporated as a nonstock
corporation or unincorporated and it is subject to those provisions of Title 5, Subtitle 2 of
the Corporations and Associations Article which are not inconsistent with this title. The
council of unit owners has, subject to any provision of this title, and except as provided in
item (22) of this subsection, the declaration, and bylaws, the following powers:
(1) To have perpetual existence, subject to the right of the unit owners to
terminate the condominium regime as provided in § 11–123 of this title;
(2) To adopt and amend reasonable rules and regulations;
(3) To adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves
and collect assessments for common expenses from unit owners;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 804
(4) To sue and be sued, complain and defend, or intervene in litigation or
administrative proceedings in its own name on behalf of itself or two or more unit owners
on matters affecting the condominium;
(5) To transact its business, carry on its operations and exercise the powers
provided in this subsection in any state, territory, district, or possession of the United
States and in any foreign country;
(6) To make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities and borrow money,
sell, mortgage, lease, pledge, exchange, convey, transfer, and otherwise dispose of any part
of its property and assets;
(7) To issue bonds, notes, and other obligations and secure the same by
mortgage or deed of trust of any part of its property, franchises, and income;
(8) To acquire by purchase or in any other manner, to take, receive, own,
hold, use, employ, improve, and otherwise deal with any property, real or personal, or any
interest therein, wherever located;
(9) To hire and terminate managing agents and other employees, agents,
and independent contractors;
(10) To purchase, take, receive, subscribe for or otherwise acquire, own,
hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, loan, pledge or otherwise dispose of, and otherwise
use and deal in and with, shares or other interests in, or obligation of corporations of the
State, or foreign corporations, and of associations, partnerships, and individuals;
(11) To invest its funds and to lend money in any manner appropriate to
enable it to carry on the operations or to fulfill the purposes named in the declaration or
bylaws, and to take and to hold real and personal property as security for the payment of
funds so invested or loaned;
(12) To regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and
modification of common elements;
(13) To cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the general
common elements;
(14) To grant easements, rights–of–way, licenses, leases in excess of 1 year,
or similar interests through or over the common elements in accordance with § 11–125(f)
of this title;
(15) To impose and receive any payments, fees, or charges for the use, rental,
or operation of the common elements other than limited common elements;
– 9 –

Ch. 804 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(16) To impose charges for late payment of assessments and, after notice
and an opportunity to be heard, levy reasonable fines for violations of the declaration,
bylaws, and rules and regulations of the council of unit owners, under § 11–113 of this title;
(17) To impose reasonable charges for the preparation and recordation of
amendments to the declaration, bylaws, rules, regulations, or resolutions, resale
certificates, or statements of unpaid assessments;
(18) To provide for the indemnification of and maintain liability insurance
for officers, directors, and any managing agent or other employee charged with the
operation or maintenance of the condominium;
(19) To enforce the implied warranties made to the council of unit owners by
the developer under § 11–131 of this title;
(20) To enforce the provisions of this title, the declaration, bylaws, and rules
and regulations of the council of unit owners against any unit owner or occupant;
(21) Generally, to exercise the powers set forth in this title and the
declaration or bylaws and to do every other act not inconsistent with law, which may be
appropriate to promote and attain the purposes set forth in this title, the declaration or
bylaws; and
(22) To designate parking for individuals with disabilities, notwithstanding
any provision in the declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations.
[(e)] (F) A unit owner may not have any right, title, or interest in any property
owned by the council of unit owners other than as holder of a percentage interest in common
expenses and common profits appurtenant to his unit.
[(f)] (G) A unit owner’s rights as holder of a percentage interest in common
expenses and common profits are such that:
(1) A unit owner’s right to possess, use, or enjoy property of the council of
unit owners shall be as provided in the bylaws; and
(2) A unit owner’s interest in the property is not assignable or attachable
separate from his unit except as provided in §§ 11–107(d) and 11–112(g) of this title.
11B–106.1.
(a) A meeting of the members of the homeowners association to elect a governing
body of the homeowners association shall be held within:
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 804
(1) 60 days from the date that at least 75% of the total number of lots that
may be part of the development after all phases are complete are sold to members of the
public for residential purposes; or
(2) If a lesser percentage is specified in the governing documents of the
homeowners association, 60 days from the date the specified lesser percentage of the total
number of lots in the development after all phases are complete are sold to members of the
public for residential purposes.
(G) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY IN CHARLES COUNTY.
(2) EACH MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL SUCCESSFULLY
COMPLETE A TRAINING CURRICULUM ON THE RESPONSIBILITIES OF A MEMBER OF
THE GOVERNING BODY DEVELOPED BY:
(I) A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMISSION RECOGNIZED BY THE
STATE OR A LOCAL GOVERNMENT; OR
(II) AN ORGANIZATION APPROVED TO ADMINISTER THE
TRAINING CURRICULUM BY A RECOGNIZED COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMISSION.
(3) EACH MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL SUCCESSFULLY
COMPLETE THE TRAINING CURRICULUM REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) IS FIRST ELECTED OR APPOINTED TO THE GOVERNING
BODY; OR
(II) FOR A MEMBER WHO IS IN OFFICE ON OCTOBER 1, 2025,
BEGINS A SUBSEQUENT TERM AS A MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING BODY.
(4) (I) THE GOVERNING BODY SHALL:
1. CERTIFY THAT EACH MEMBER SUCCESSFULLY
COMPLETES THE TRAINING CURRICULUM REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION;
2. RETAIN A COPY OF THE CERTIFICATE OF
COMPLETION OF EACH MEMBER; AND
3. WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE CERTIFICATION OF THE
MEMBER, REPORT TO THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMISSION ON THE
CERTIFICATION.
– 11 –

Ch. 804 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLETION ISSUED UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE VALID FOR 3 YEARS.
(III) IF A MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING BODY REMAINS A
MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING BODY AT THE TIME THE CERTIFICATE EXPIRES, THE
MEMBER SHALL RENEW THE CERTIFICATION BY SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETING THE
TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(5) IF A MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING BODY DOES NOT
SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETE THE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION,
THE GOVERNING BODY MAY:
(I) REMOVE THE MEMBER FROM THE GOVERNING BODY; OR
(II) INVALIDATE A VOTE OF THE MEMBER.
[(g)] (H) If the declarant fails to comply with the requirements of this section, an
aggrieved lot owner may submit the dispute to the Division of Consumer Protection of the
Office of the Attorney General under § 11B–115(c) of this title.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 12 –